Missouri, session 2026, HB2383.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Sections 301.010, 301.218, 301.225, 407.300,
2
407.303, and 569.086, RSMo, are repealed and eleven new sections
3
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 301.010,
4
301.218, 301.225, 407.298, 407.299, 407.300, 407.303, 407.304,
5
569.086, 569.117, and 569.119, to read as follows:
1
301.010. As used in this chapter and sections 304.010
2
to 304.040, 3 0 4.120 to 304.260, and sections 307.010 to
3
307.175, the following terms mean:
4
(1) "All-terrain vehicle", any motorized vehicle
5
manufact u red and used exclusively for off-highway use, with
6
an unladen dry weight of one thousand five hundred pounds or
7
less, traveling on three, four or more nonhighway tires,
8
with either:
9
(a) A seat designed to be straddled by the operator,
10
and hand l ebars for steering control, but excluding an
11
electric bicycle; or
12
(b) A width of fifty inches or less, measured from
13
outside o f tire rim to outside of tire rim, regardless of
14
seating or steering arrangement;
15
(2) "Autocycle", a three-wheeled motor vehicle which
16
the driv e rs and passengers ride in a partially or completely
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS HB 2383 2
17
enclosed nonstraddle seating area, that is designed to be
18
controlled with a steering wheel and pedals, and that has
19
met applicable Department of Transportation National Highway
20
Traffic Safety Administration requirements or federal
21
motorcycle safety standards;
22
(3) "Automobile transporter", any vehicle combination
23
capable o f carrying cargo on the power unit and designed and
24
used for the transport of assembled motor vehicles,
25
including truck camper units;
26
(4) "Axle load", the total load transmitted to the
27
road by a ll wheels whose centers are included between two
28
parallel transverse vertical planes forty inches apart,
29
extending across the full width of the vehicle;
30
(5) "Backhaul", the return trip of a vehicle
31
transpor t ing cargo or general freight, especially when
32
carrying goods back over all or part of the same route;
33
(6) "Boat transporter", any vehicle combination
34
capable o f carrying cargo on the power unit and designed and
35
used specifically to transport assembled boats and boat
36
hulls. Boats may be partially disassembled to facilitate
37
transp o rting;
38
(7) "Body shop", a business that repairs physical
39
damage o n motor vehicles that are not owned by the shop or
40
its officers or employees by mending, straightening,
41
replacing body parts, or painting;
42
(8) "Bus", a motor vehicle primarily for the
43
transpor t ation of a driver and eight or more passengers but
44
not including shuttle buses;
45
(9) "Commercial motor vehicle", a motor vehicle
46
designed or regularly used for carrying freight and
47
merchandise, or more than eight passengers but not including
48
vanpools or shuttle buses;

SCS HB 2383 3
49
(10) "Cotton trailer", a trailer designed for
50
transport i ng cotton at speeds less than seventy miles per
51
hour from field to field or from field to market and return;
52
(11) "Dealer", any person, firm, corporation,
53
associati o n, agent or subagent engaged in the sale or
54
exchange of new, used or reconstructed motor vehicles or
55
trailers;
56
(12) "Director" or "director of revenue", the director
57
of the de p artment of revenue;
58
(13) "Driveaway operation":
59
(a) T he movement of a motor vehicle or trailer by any
60
person o r motor carrier other than a dealer over any public
61
highway, under its own power singly, or in a fixed
62
combination of two or more vehicles, for the purpose of
63
delivery for sale or for delivery either before or after
64
sale;
65
(b) The movement of any vehicle or vehicles, not owned
66
by the t r ansporter, constituting the commodity being
67
transported, by a person engaged in the business of
68
furnishing drivers and operators for the purpose of
69
transporting vehicles in transit from one place to another
70
by the driveaway or towaway methods; or
71
(c) The movement of a motor vehicle by any person who
72
is lawfu l ly engaged in the business of transporting or
73
delivering vehicles that are not the person's own and
74
vehicles of a type otherwise required to be registered, by
75
the driveaway or towaway methods, from a point of
76
manufacture, assembly or distribution or from the owner of
77
the vehicles to a dealer or sales agent of a manufacturer or
78
to any consignee designated by the shipper or consignor;
79
(14) "Dromedary", a box, deck, or plate mounted behind
80
the cab a n d forward of the fifth wheel on the frame of the

SCS HB 2383 4
81
power unit of a truck tractor-semitrailer combination. A
82
truck tractor equipped with a dromedary may carry part of a
83
load when operating independently or in a combination with a
84
semitrailer;
85
(15) "Electric bicycle", a bicycle equipped with fully
86
operable p edals, a saddle or seat for the rider, and an
87
electric motor of less than 750 watts that meets the
88
requirements of one of the following three classes:
89
(a) "Class 1 electric bicycle", an electric bicycle
90
equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the
91
rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when
92
the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour;
93
(b) "Class 2 electric bicycle", an electric bicycle
94
equipped with a motor that may be used exclusively to propel
95
the bicycle and that is not capable of providing assistance
96
when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour;
97
or
98
(c) "Class 3 electric bicycle", an electric bicycle
99
equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the
100
rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when
101
the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per hour;
102
(16) "Farm tractor", a tractor used exclusively for
103
agricultu r al purposes;
104
(17) "Fleet", any group of ten or more motor vehicles
105
owned by t he same owner;
106
(18) "Fleet vehicle", a motor vehicle which is
107
included a s part of a fleet;
108
(19) "Fullmount", a vehicle mounted completely on the
109
frame of e ither the first or last vehicle in a saddlemount
110
combination;

SCS HB 2383 5
111
(20) "Gross weight", the weight of vehicle and/or
112
vehicle c o mbination without load, plus the weight of any
113
load thereon;
114
(21) "Hail-damaged vehicle", any vehicle, the body of
115
which has become dented as the result of the impact of hail;
116
(22) "Highway", any public thoroughfare for vehicles,
117
including state roads, county roads and public streets,
118
avenues, boulevards, parkways or alleys in any municipality;
119
(23) "Improved highway", a highway which has been
120
paved wit h gravel, macadam, concrete, brick or asphalt, or
121
surfaced in such a manner that it shall have a hard, smooth
122
surface;
123
(24) "Intersecting highway", any highway which joins
124
another, w hether or not it crosses the same;
125
(25) "Junk vehicle", a vehicle which:
126
(a) I s incapable of operation or use upon the highways
127
and has n o resale value except as a source of parts or
128
scrap; or
129
(b) Has been designated as junk or a substantially
130
equivale n t designation by this state or any other state;
131
(26) "Kit vehicle", a motor vehicle assembled by a
132
person ot h er than a generally recognized manufacturer of
133
motor vehicles by the use of a glider kit or replica
134
purchased from an authorized manufacturer and accompanied by
135
a manufacturer's statement of origin;
136
(27) "Land improvement contractors' commercial motor
137
vehicle", any not-for-hire commercial motor vehicle the
138
operation of which is confined to:
139
(a) An area that extends not more than a radius of one
140
hundred f ifty miles from its home base of operations when
141
transporting its owner's machinery, equipment, or auxiliary
142
supplies to or from projects involving soil and water

SCS HB 2383 6
143
conservation, or to and from equipment dealers' maintenance
144
facilities for maintenance purposes; or
145
(b) An area that extends not more than a radius of
146
fifty mi l es from its home base of operations when
147
transporting its owner's machinery, equipment, or auxiliary
148
supplies to or from projects not involving soil and water
149
conservation.
150
Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prevent
151
any motor vehicle from being registered as a commercial
152
motor vehicle or local commercial motor vehicle;
153
(28) "Local commercial motor vehicle", a commercial
154
motor veh i cle whose operations are confined to a
155
municipality and that area extending not more than fifty
156
miles therefrom, or a commercial motor vehicle whose
157
property-carrying operations are confined solely to the
158
transportation of property owned by any person who is the
159
owner or operator of such vehicle to or from a farm owned by
160
such person or under the person's control by virtue of a
161
landlord and tenant lease; provided that any such property
162
transported to any such farm is for use in the operation of
163
such farm;
164
(29) "Local log truck", a commercial motor vehicle
165
which is r egistered pursuant to this chapter to operate as a
166
motor vehicle on the public highways of this state; used
167
exclusively in this state; used to transport harvested
168
forest products; operated solely at a forested site and in
169
an area extending not more than a one hundred fifty mile
170
radius from such site; and when operated on the national
171
system of interstate and defense highways described in 23
172
U.S.C. Section 103, as amended, or outside the one hundred
173
fifty mile radius from such site with an extended distance

SCS HB 2383 7
174
local log truck permit, does not have more than four axles,
175
and does not pull a trailer which has more than three
176
axles. Harvesting equipment which is used specifically for
177
cuttin g , felling, trimming, delimbing, debarking, chipping,
178
skidding, loading, unloading, and stacking may be
179
transported on a local log truck;
180
(30) "Local log truck tractor", a commercial motor
181
vehicle w h ich is registered under this chapter to operate as
182
a motor vehicle on the public highways of this state; used
183
exclusively in this state; used to transport harvested
184
forest products, operated at a forested site and in an area
185
extending not more than a one hundred fifty mile radius from
186
such site; and when operated on the national system of
187
interstate and defense highways described in 23 U.S.C.
188
Section 103, as amended, or outside the one hundred fifty
189
mile radius from such site with an extended distance local
190
log truck permit, does not have more than three axles and
191
does not pull a trailer which has more than three axles;
192
(31) "Local transit bus", a bus whose operations are
193
confined w holly within a municipal corporation, or wholly
194
within a municipal corporation and a commercial zone, as
195
defined in section 390.020, adjacent thereto, forming a part
196
of a public transportation system within such municipal
197
corporation and such municipal corporation and adjacent
198
commercial zone;
199
(32) "Log truck", a vehicle which is not a local log
200
truck or l ocal log truck tractor and is used exclusively to
201
transport harvested forest products to and from forested
202
sites which is registered pursuant to this chapter to
203
operate as a motor vehicle on the public highways of this
204
state for the transportation of harvested forest products;

SCS HB 2383 8
205
(33) "Major component parts", the rear clip, cowl,
206
frame, bo d y, cab, front-end assembly, and front clip, as
207
those terms are defined by the director of revenue pursuant
208
to rules and regulations or by illustrations;
209
(34) "Manufacturer", any person, firm, corporation or
210
associati o n engaged in the business of manufacturing or
211
assembling motor vehicles, trailers or vessels for sale;
212
(35) "Metal recycling entity" or "scrap metal yard",
213
any busin e ss that is predominantly engaged in:
214
(a) Performing the manufacturing process by which
215
scrap, u s ed, or obsolete ferrous or nonferrous metal is
216
converted into raw material products consisting of prepared
217
grades and having an existing or potential economic value,
218
by a method that in part requires the use of powered tools
219
and equipment, including processes that involve processing,
220
sorting, cutting, classifying, cleaning, baling, wrapping,
221
shredding, shearing, or changing the physical form of that
222
metal;
223
(b) The use of raw material products described under
224
paragrap h (a) of this subdivision in the manufacture of
225
producer or consumer goods; or
226
(c) Purchasing or otherwise acquiring scrap, used, or
227
obsolete ferrous or nonferrous metals to be used as
228
described in paragraphs (a) or (b) of this subdivision;
229
(36) "Motor change vehicle", a vehicle manufactured
230
prior to A ugust, 1957, which receives a new, rebuilt or used
231
engine, and which used the number stamped on the original
232
engine as the vehicle identification number;
233
[(36)] (37) "Motor vehicle", any self-propelled
234
vehicle not oper a ted exclusively upon tracks, except farm
235
tractors and electric bicycles;

SCS HB 2383 9
236
[(37)] (38) "Motor vehicle primarily for business
237
use", any ve hicl e other than a recreational motor vehicle,
238
motorcycle, motortricycle, or any commercial motor vehicle
239
licensed for over twelve thousand pounds:
240
(a) Offered for hire or lease; or
241
(b) The owner of which also owns ten or more such
242
motor ve h icles;
243
[(38)] (39) "Motorcycle", a motor vehicle operated on
244
two wheels;
245
[(39)] (40) "Motorized bicycle", any two-wheeled or
246
three-wheele d de v ice having an automatic transmission and a
247
motor with a cylinder capacity of not more than fifty cubic
248
centimeters, which produces less than three gross brake
249
horsepower, and is capable of propelling the device at a
250
maximum speed of not more than thirty miles per hour on
251
level ground, but excluding an electric bicycle;
252
[(40)] (41) "Motortricycle", a motor vehicle upon
253
which the op erat o r straddles or sits astride that is
254
designed to be controlled by handle bars and is operated on
255
three wheels, including a motorcycle while operated with any
256
conveyance, temporary or otherwise, requiring the use of a
257
third wheel, but excluding an electric bicycle. A
258
motortricycle shall not be included in the defin ition of all-
259
terrain vehicle;
260
[(41)] (42) "Municipality", any city, town or village,
261
whether inco rpor a ted or not;
262
[(42)] (43) "Nonresident", a resident of a state or
263
country othe r th a n the state of Missouri;
264
[(43)] (44) "Non-USA-std motor vehicle", a motor
265
vehicle not orig i nally manufactured in compliance with
266
United States emissions or safety standards;

SCS HB 2383 10
267
[(44)] (45) "Operator", any person who operates or
268
drives a mot or v e hicle;
269
[(45)] (46) "Owner", any person, firm, corporation or
270
association, who holds the legal title to a vehicle or who
271
has executed a buyer's order or retail installment sales
272
contract with a motor vehicle dealer licensed under sections
273
301.550 to 301.580 for the purchase of a vehicle with an
274
immediate right of possession vested in the transferee, or
275
in the event a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for
276
the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of
277
purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the
278
agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested
279
in the conditional vendee or lessee, or in the event a
280
mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then such
281
conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed
282
the owner;
283
[(46)] (47) "Public garage", a place of business where
284
motor vehicl es a r e housed, stored, repaired, reconstructed
285
or repainted for persons other than the owners or operators
286
of such place of business;
287
[(47)] (48) "Rebuilder", a business that repairs or
288
rebuilds mot or v e hicles owned by the rebuilder, but does not
289
include certificated common or contract carriers of persons
290
or property;
291
[(48)] (49) "Reconstructed motor vehicle", a vehicle
292
that is alte red f rom its original construction by the
293
addition or substitution of two or more new or used major
294
component parts, excluding motor vehicles made from all new
295
parts, and new multistage manufactured vehicles;
296
[(49)] (50) "Recreational motor vehicle", any motor
297
vehicle desi gned , constructed or substantially modified so
298
that it may be used and is used for the purposes of

SCS HB 2383 11
299
temporary housing quarters, including therein sleeping and
300
eating facilities which are either permanently attached to
301
the motor vehicle or attached to a unit which is securely
302
attached to the motor vehicle. Nothing herein shall prevent
303
any motor vehicle from being r e gistered as a commercial
304
motor vehicle if the motor vehicle could otherwise be so
305
registered;
306
[(50)] (51) "Recreational off-highway vehicle", any
307
motorized ve hicl e manufactured and used exclusively for off-
308
highway use which is more than fifty inches but no more than
309
eighty inches in width, measured from outside of tire rim to
310
outside of tire rim, with an unladen dry weight of three
311
thousand five hundred pounds or less, traveling on four or
312
more nonhighway tires and which may have access to ATV
313
trails;
314
[(51)] (52) "Recreational trailer", any trailer
315
designed, co nstr u cted, or substantially modified so that it
316
may be used and is used for the purpose of temporary housing
317
quarters, including therein sleeping or eating facilities,
318
which can be temporarily attached to a motor vehicle or
319
attached to a unit which is securely attached to a motor
320
vehicle;
321
[(52)] (53) "Rollback or car carrier", any vehicle
322
specifically des i gned to transport wrecked, disabled or
323
otherwise inoperable vehicles, when the transportation is
324
directly connected to a wrecker or towing service;
325
[(53)] (54) "Saddlemount combination", a combination
326
of vehicles in w h ich a truck or truck tractor tows one or
327
more trucks or truck tractors, each connected by a saddle to
328
the frame or fifth wheel of the vehicle in front of it. The
329
"saddle" is a mechanism that connects the front axle of the
330
towed vehicle to the frame or fifth wheel of the vehicle in

SCS HB 2383 12
331
front and functions like a fifth wheel kingpin connection.
332
When two vehicles are towed in this manner the combination
333
is called a "double saddlemount combination". When three
334
vehicles are towed in this manner, the combin a tion is called
335
a "triple saddlemount combination";
336
[(54)] (55) "Salvage dealer and dismantler", a
337
business tha t di s mantles used motor vehicles for the sale of
338
the parts thereof, and buys and sells used motor vehicle
339
parts and accessories;
340
[(55)] (56) "Salvage vehicle", a motor vehicle,
341
semitrailer, or h ouse trailer which:
342
(a) Was damaged during a year that is no more than six
343
years af t er the manufacturer's model year designation for
344
such vehicle to the extent that the total cost of repairs to
345
rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle to its condition
346
immediately before it was damaged for legal operation on the
347
roads or highways exceeds eighty percent of the fair market
348
value of the vehicle immediately preceding the time it was
349
damaged;
350
(b) By reason of condition or circumstance, has been
351
declared salvage, either by its owner, or by a person, firm,
352
corporation, or other legal entity exercising the right of
353
security interest in it;
354
(c) Has been declared salvage by an insurance company
355
as a res u lt of settlement of a claim;
356
(d) Ownership of which is evidenced by a salvage
357
title; o r
358
(e) Is abandoned property which is titled pursuant to
359
section 3 04.155 or section 304.157 and designated with the
360
words "salvage/abandoned property". The total cost of
361
repairs to rebuild or reconstruct t h e vehicle shall not
362
include the cost of repairing, replacing, or reinstalling

SCS HB 2383 13
363
inflatable safety restraints, tires, sound systems, or
364
damage as a result of hail, or any sales tax on parts or
365
materials to rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle. For
366
purposes of this definition, "fair market value" means the
367
retail value of a motor vehicle as:
368
a. Set forth in a current edition of any nationally
369
recogni z ed compilation of retail values, including automated
370
databases, or from publications commonly used by the
371
automotive and insurance industries to establish the values
372
of motor vehicles;
373
b. Determined pursuant to a market survey of
374
compara b le vehicles with regard to condition and equipment;
375
and
376
c. Determined by an insurance company using any other
377
procedu r e recognized by the insurance industry, including
378
market surveys, that is applied by the company in a uniform
379
manner;
380
[(56)] (57) "School bus", any motor vehicle used
381
solely to tr ansp o rt students to or from school or to
382
transport students to or from any place for educational
383
purposes;
384
[(57)] (58) "Scrap processor", a business that,
385
through the use o f fixed or mobile equipment, flattens,
386
crushes, or otherwise accepts motor vehicles and vehicle
387
parts for processing or transportation to a shredder or
388
scrap metal operator for recycling;
389
[(58)] (59) "Shuttle bus", a motor vehicle used or
390
maintained b y an y person, firm, or corporation as an
391
incidental service to transport patrons or customers of the
392
regular business of such person, firm, or corporation to and
393
from the place of business of the person, firm, or
394
corporation providing the service at no fee or charge.

SCS HB 2383 14
395
Shuttle buses shall not be registered as buses or as
396
commercial motor vehicles;
397
[(59)] (60) "Special mobile equipment", every self-
398
propelled ve hicl e not designed or used primarily for the
399
transportation of persons or property and incidentally
400
operated or moved over the highways, including farm
401
equipment, implements of husbandry, road construction or
402
maintenance machinery, ditch-digging apparatus, stone
403
crushers, air compressors, power shovels, cranes, graders,
404
rollers, well-drillers and wood-sawing equipment used for
405
hire, asphalt spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders,
406
ditchers, leveling graders, finished machines, motor
407
graders, road rollers, scarifiers, earth-moving carryalls,
408
scrapers, drag lines, concrete pump trucks, rock-drilling
409
and earth-moving equipment. This enumeration shall be
410
deemed partial and shall no t operate to exclude other such
411
vehicles which are within the general terms of this section;
412
[(60)] (61) "Specially constructed motor vehicle", a
413
motor vehicl e wh i ch shall not have been originally
414
constructed under a distinctive name, make, model or type by
415
a manufacturer of motor vehicles. The term specially
416
constructed motor vehicle include s kit vehicles;
417
[(61)] (62) "Stinger-steered combination", a truck
418
tractor-semi trai l er wherein the fifth wheel is located on a
419
drop frame located behind and below the rearmost axle of the
420
power unit;
421
[(62)] (63) "Tandem axle", a group of two or more
422
axles, arran ged o ne behind another, the distance between the
423
extremes of which is more than forty inches and not more
424
than ninety-six inches apart;
425
[(63)] (64) "Towaway trailer transporter combination",
426
a combinatio n of vehicles consisting of a trailer

SCS HB 2383 15
427
transporter towing unit and two trailers or semitrailers,
428
with a total weight that does not exceed twenty-six thousand
429
pounds; and in which the trailers or semitrailers carry no
430
property and constitute inventory property of a
431
manufacturer, distributer, or dealer of such trailers or
432
semitrailers;
433
[(64)] (65) "Tractor", "truck tractor" or "truck-
434
tractor", a self - propelled motor vehicle designed for
435
drawing other vehicles, but not for the carriage of any load
436
when operating independently. When attached to a
437
semitrailer, it supports a pa r t of the weight thereof;
438
[(65)] (66) "Trailer", any vehicle without motive
439
power design ed f o r carrying property or passengers on its
440
own structure and for being drawn by a self-propelled
441
vehicle, except those running exclusively on tracks,
442
including a semitrailer or vehicle of the trailer type so
443
designed and used in conjunction with a self-propelled
444
vehicle that a considerable part of its own weight rests
445
upon and is carried by the towing vehicle. The term trailer
446
shall not include cotton trailers as defin e d in this section
447
and shall not include manufactured homes as defined in
448
section 700.010;
449
[(66)] (67) "Trailer transporter towing unit", a power
450
unit that is not used to carry property when operating in a
451
towaway trailer transporter combination;
452
[(67)] (68) "Truck", a motor vehicle designed, used,
453
or maintaine d fo r the transportation of property;
454
[(68)] (69) "Truck-tractor semitrailer-semitrailer", a
455
combination vehi c le in which the two trailing units are
456
connected with a B-train assembly which is a rigid frame
457
extension attached to the rear frame of a first semitrailer
458
which allows for a fifth-wheel connection point for the

SCS HB 2383 16
459
second semitrailer and has one less articulation point than
460
the conventional A-dolly connected truck-tractor semitrailer-
461
trailer combination;
462
[(69)] (70) "Truck-trailer boat transporter
463
combination" , a b oat transporter combination consisting of a
464
straight truck towing a trailer using typically a ball and
465
socket connection with the trailer axle located
466
substantially at the trailer center of gravity rather than
467
the rear of the trailer but so as to maintain a downward
468
force on the trailer tongue;
469
[(70)] (71) "Used parts dealer", a business that buys
470
and sells us ed m o tor vehicle parts or accessories, but not
471
including a business that sells only new, remanufactured or
472
rebuilt parts. Business does not include isolated sales at
473
a swap meet of less than three days;
474
[(71)] (72) "Utility vehicle", any motorized vehicle
475
manufactured and used exclusively for off-highway use which
476
is more than fifty inches but no more than eighty inches in
477
width, measured from outside of tire rim to outside of tire
478
rim, with an unladen dry weight of three thousand five
479
hundred pounds or less, traveling on four or six wheels, to
480
be used primarily for landscaping, lawn care, or maintenance
481
purposes;
482
[(72)] (73) "Vanpool", any van or other motor vehicle
483
used or main tain e d by any person, group, firm, corporation,
484
association, city, county or state agency, or any member
485
thereof, for the transportation of not less than eight nor
486
more than forty-eight employees, per motor vehicle, to and
487
from their place of employment; however, a vanpool shall not
488
be included in the definition of the term bus or commercial
489
motor vehicle as defined in this section, nor shall a
490
vanpool driver be deemed a chauffeur as that term is defined

SCS HB 2383 17
491
by section 303.020; nor shall use of a vanpool vehicle for
492
ride-sharing arrangements, recreational, personal, or
493
maintenance uses constitute an unlicensed use of the motor
494
vehicle, unless used for monetary profit other than for use
495
in a ride-sharing arrangement;
496
[(73)] (74) "Vehicle", any mechanical device on
497
wheels, desi gned primarily for use, or used, on highways,
498
except motorized bicycles, electric bicycles, vehicles
499
propelled or drawn by horses or human power, or vehicles
500
used exclusively on fixed rails or tracks, or cotton
501
trailers or motorized wheelchairs operated by handicapped
502
persons;
503
[(74)] (75) "Wrecker" or "tow truck", any emergency
504
commercial v ehic l e equipped, designed and used to assist or
505
render aid and transport or tow disabled or wrecked vehicles
506
from a highway, road, street or highway rights-of-way to a
507
point of storage or repair, including towing a replacement
508
vehicle to replace a disabled or wrecked vehicle;
509
[(75)] (76) "Wrecker or towing service", the act of
510
transporting , to w ing or recovering with a wrecker, tow
511
truck, rollback or car carrier any vehicle not owned by the
512
operator of the wrecker, tow truck, rollback or car carrier
513
for which the operator directly or indirectly receives
514
compensation or other personal gain.
1
301.218. 1. No person shall, except as an incident to
2
the sale, rep a ir, rebuilding or servicing of vehicles by a
3
licensed franchised motor vehicle dealer, carry on or
4
conduct the following business unless licensed to do so by
5
the department of revenue under sections 301.217 to 301.229:
6
(1) Selling used parts of or used accessories for
7
vehicles as a used parts dealer, as defined in section
8
301.010;

SCS HB 2383 18
9
(2) Salvaging, wrecking or dismantling vehicles for
10
resale o f the parts thereof as a salvage dealer or
11
dismantler, as defined in section 301.010;
12
(3) Rebuilding and repairing four or more wrecked or
13
dismantl e d vehicles in a calendar year as a rebuilder or
14
body shop, as defined in section 301.010;
15
(4) Processing scrapped vehicles or vehicle parts as a
16
scrap pr o cessor, as defined in section 301.010.
17
(5) Accepting scrap metals or metal parts as a metal
18
recyclin g entity or scrap metal yard, as defined in section
19
301.010.
20
2. Sales at a salvage pool or a salvage disposal sale
21
shall b e open only to and made to persons actually engaged
22
in and holding a current license under sections 301.217 to
23
301.221 and 301.550 to 301.573 or any person from another
24
state or jurisdiction who is legally allowed in his or her
25
state of domicile to purchase for resale, rebuild,
26
dismantle, crush, or scrap either motor vehicles or salvage
27
vehicles, and to persons who reside in a foreign country
28
that are purchasing salvage vehicles for export outside of
29
the United States. Operators of salvage pools or salvage
30
disposal sales sha l l keep a record, for three years, of
31
sales of salvage vehicles with the purchasers' name and
32
address, and the year, make, and vehicle identification
33
number for each vehicle. These records shall be open for
34
inspection as provided in section 301.225. Such records
35
shall be submitted to the department on a quarterly basis.
36
3. The operator of a salvage pool or salvage disposal
37
sale, o r subsequent purchaser, who sells a nonrepairable
38
motor vehicle or a salvage motor vehicle to a person who is
39
not a resident of the United States at a salvage pool or a
40
salvage disposal sale shall:

SCS HB 2383 19
41
(1) Stamp on the face of the title so as not to
42
obscure a ny name, date, or mileage statement on the title
43
the words "FOR EXPORT ONLY" in capital letters that are
44
black; and
45
(2) Stamp in each unused reassignment space on the
46
back of t he title the words "FOR EXPORT ONLY" and print the
47
number of the dealer's salvage vehicle license, name of the
48
salvage pool, or the name of the governmental entity, as
49
applicable.
50
The words "FOR EXPORT ONLY" required under subdivisions (1)
51
and (2) of this subsection shall be at least two inches wide
52
and clearly legible. Copies of the stamped titles shall be
53
forwarded to the dep a rtment.
54
4. The director of revenue shall issue a separate
55
license for each kind of business described in subsection 1
56
of this section, to be entitled and designated as either
57
"used parts dealer"; "salvage dealer or dismantler";
58
"rebuilder or body shop"; [or] "scrap processor"; "metal
59
recycling entity"; or "scrap metal yard" license.
60
5. Any person who violates provisions of this section
61
shall b e guilty of a class A misdemeanor, punishable only by
62
a fine. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
63
preclud e a person violating provisions of this section from
64
being prosecuted for any other applicable criminal offense.
65
In addition to any such fine, after August 28, 2026, an
66
application for a license under this section may be denied,
67
or any current license may be revoked or suspended by the
68
department if the applicant or licensee has knowingly or
69
intentionally:
70
(1) Violated provisions of sections 407.298 to 498.303;

SCS HB 2383 20
71
(2) Made a materially false statement in the
72
applicat i on for a license; or
73
(3) Engaged in a fraudulent act in connection with any
74
purchase or sale of any regulated metal, as defined in
75
section 407.298.
1
301.225. 1. Every person licensed or required to be
2
licensed shal l ma i ntain for three years on vehicles not more
3
than seven years old a record of:
4
(1) Every vehicle or used transmission, rear end,
5
cowl, fr a me, body, front end assembly or engine of or for a
6
vehicle received or acquired by him, its description and
7
identifying number, if any, the date of its receipt or
8
acquisition, and the name and address of the person from
9
whom received or acquired;
10
(2) Every vehicle wrecked, dismantled or disposed of
11
by him, a nd the date of its wrecking or dismantling and, if
12
sold to a scrap metal operator, the operator's name and
13
address.
14
2. A ny person licensed or required to be licensed
15
under t h is section shall maintain records consistent with
16
the requirements pursuant to section 407.300 for three years
17
on copper, brass, or bronze material, as defined in section
18
407.298, regardless of the condition or length of such metal
19
and whether or not it is mixed or conjoined with any other
20
substances.
21
Every such record shall be retained by the person licensed
22
or required to be licensed at his principal place of
23
business and shall be open to inspection by any
24
representative of the department, member or authorized or
25
designated employee of the Missouri highway patrol, or any
26
police officer during reasonable business hours. Members of

SCS HB 2383 21
27
the patrol or any police officer may inspect the premises of
28
every person licensed or required to be licensed at any time
29
that business is being conducted or work is being performed,
30
whether or not open to the public to enforce the provisions
31
of sections 301.217 to 301.229.
1
407.298. For purposes of sections 407.299 to 407.304,
2
the following terms mean:
3
(1) "Copper, brass, or bronze":
4
(a) A power inverter, bus bar, or insulated or
5
noninsul a ted copper wire or cable that contains copper or an
6
alloy of copper or zinc and is used by any public utility,
7
common carrier, telecommunications company, cable provider,
8
video service provider, or other communications-related
9
provider, electrical corporation, water utility, municipal
10
utility, or any other public utility regulated under
11
chapters 386 or 393;
12
(b) Any copper or brass item of a type commonly used
13
in const r uction or by a public utility, telecommunications
14
company, cable provider, video service provider, or other
15
communications-related provider; or
16
(c) Any copper pipe or copper tubing;
17
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of revenue;
18
(3) "Metal recycling entity" or "scrap metal yard",
19
any busi n ess that is predominantly engaged in:
20
(a) Performing the manufacturing process by which
21
scrap, u s ed, or obsolete ferrous or nonferrous metal is
22
converted into raw material products consisting of prepared
23
grades and having an existing or potential economic value,
24
by a method that in part requires the use of powered tools
25
and equipment, including processes that involve processing,
26
sorting, cutting, classifying, cleaning, baling, wrapping,

SCS HB 2383 22
27
shredding, shearing, or changing the physical form of that
28
metal;
29
(b) The use of raw material products described under
30
paragrap h (a) of this subdivision in the manufacture of
31
producer or consumer goods; or
32
(c) Purchasing or otherwise acquiring scrap, used, or
33
obsolete ferrous or nonferrous metals to be used as
34
described in paragraphs (a) or (b) of this subdivision;
35
(4) "Regulated metal":
36
(a) Copper, brass, or bronze;
37
(b) Aluminum wire, cable, pipe, tubing, bar, ingot,
38
rod, fit t ing, or fastener;
39
(c) Material of any condition or length containing
40
copper o r aluminum that is used for farming, as defined in
41
section 350.010;
42
(d) Detached catalytic converter; or
43
(e) Any motor vehicle, heavy equipment, or tractor
44
battery.
1
407.299. 1. No later than the close of business on a
2
metal recycli n g e n tity or scrap metal yard's second working
3
day after the date of the purchase or acquisition of a
4
regulated metal, the entity or yard shall send an electronic
5
transaction report to the department on the department's
6
website using an electronic statewide reporting system
7
established by the department under subsection 3 of this
8
section. The report shall contain the information required
9
to be re c orded pursuant to section 407.300, except that the
10
entity or yard shall not be required to disclose the weight
11
and purchase price of the regulated metal.
12
2. A metal recycling entity or scrap metal yard may
13
submit t he transaction report under subsection 1 of this
14
section by facsimile if the department approves an exception

SCS HB 2383 23
15
to the electronic reporting requirement following receipt
16
and review of an:
17
(1) Application requesting an exception to the
18
electron i c reporting requirements; and
19
(2) Affidavit stating that the entity or yard does not
20
have an a vailable and reliable means of submitting the
21
transaction report electronically.
22
3. The department shall establish a statewide
23
electro n ic reporting system to track the sales of regulated
24
metals required to be reported to the department under
25
subsection 1 of this section.
26
4. The department shall post on its website a summary
27
of the r eports under subsection 2 of this section. Such
28
reports shall only be accessible to metal recyclin g entities
29
and scrap metal yards that are required to submit
30
information to the department under this section. The
31
summary shall be classified as follows:
32
(1) By county where the sale of a regulated metal
33
occurred ; and
34
(2) The frequency with which an individual, identified
35
by the f i rst and last name and address, presents regulated
36
metals for sale to a metal recycling entity or scrap metal
37
yard.
38
The summary under this subsection shall not identify any
39
person or entity to which the metal recycling entity or
40
scrap metal yard sells regulated material. The provisions
41
of this subsection shall not apply to any r egulated metal
42
sold to a metal recycling entity or scrap metal yard by a
43
public or private cemetery, political subdivision,
44
telecommunications provider, cable provider, wireless
45
service or other communications-related provider, electrical

SCS HB 2383 24
46
cooperative, water utility, municipal utility or utility
47
regulated under chapter 386 or 393, or other business entity
48
that routinely uses regulated metals in the course of
49
business of such business entity as permitted by current law.
50
5. The department shall make available on its website
51
a publi c ly accessible list of all licensed metal recycling
52
entities and scrap metal yards. The list shall contain the
53
following information for each l icensed metal recycling
54
entity or scrap metal yard:
55
(1) Registered business name;
56
(2) Physical address;
57
(3) Name and contact information of the owner or
58
operator of the entity or yard;
59
(4) A description of the extent to which an entity or
60
yard eng a ges in transactions involving catalytic converters;
61
and
62
(5) A statement that no purchases of regulated metals
63
shall be accepted before 7:00 a.m. or after 7:00 p.m.
64
6. Information provided to the department under
65
subsect i on 4 of this section shall not be subject to public
66
disclosure under chapter 610, except for law enforcement
67
purposes, as described in section 301.225. Except as
68
otherwise provided herein, the department s hall maintain the
69
confidentiality of the name of the seller, the price paid
70
for the purchase of regulated metal, and the quantity of
71
regulated metal purchased.
72
7. The department may promulgate administrative rules
73
and reg u lations for the development of a statewide
74
electronic reporting system to track the sales of regulated
75
metal reported to the department, which shall include the
76
development of a no-buy list as provided in section
77
407.304. The department may collaborate with any local law

SCS HB 2383 25
78
enforcement agency to prepare a searchable, electronic list
79
that includes the names and a description of persons known
80
to have received stolen property. Any rule or portion of a
81
rule, as that term is defined in s ection 536.010, that is
82
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
83
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
84
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
85
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
86
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
87
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
88
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
89
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
90
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
91
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
1
407.300. 1. Every purchaser or collector of, or
2
dealer in, ju n k, s crap metal, or any secondhand property who
3
obtains items for resale or profit shall only make such
4
purchases or trades between 7:00 a.m. and 7:00 p.m. and keep
5
a register containing a written or electronic record for
6
each purchase or trade in which each type of material
7
subject to the provisions of this section is obtained for
8
value. There shall be a separate record for each
9
transa c tion involving any[:
10
(1) Copper, brass, or bronze;
11
(2) Aluminum wire, cable, pipe, tubing, bar, ingot,
12
rod, fit t ing, or fastener;
13
(3) Material containing copper or aluminum that is
14
knowingl y used for farming purposes as farming is defined in
15
section 350.010; whatever may be the condition or length of
16
such metal;
17
(4) Detached catalytic converter; or

SCS HB 2383 26
18
(5) Motor vehicle, heavy equipment, or tractor
19
battery] regulated metal, as defined in section 407.298.
20
2. The record required by this section shall contain
21
the fol l owing data:
22
(1) A copy of the driver's license or photo
23
identifi c ation issued by the state or by the United States
24
government or agency thereof of the person from whom the
25
material is obtained;
26
(2) The current address, gender, birth date, and a
27
color ph o tograph of the person from whom the material is
28
obtained if not included or are different from the
29
identification required in subdivision (1) of this
30
subsection;
31
(3) The date, time, and place of the transaction;
32
(4) The license plate number of the vehicle used by
33
the sell e r during the transaction; [and]
34
(5) A full description of the material, including the
35
weight a n d purchase price;
36
(6) A photo of any regulated metal purchased; and
37
(7) An affidavit stating that the seller owns or
38
otherwis e has authority to sell the regulated metal being
39
offered for sale.
40
3. The records required under this section shall be
41
maintai n ed for a minimum of thirty-six months from when such
42
material is obtained and shall be available for inspection
43
by any law enforcement officer.
44
4. No transaction that includes a detached catalytic
45
convert e r shall occur at any location other than the fixed
46
place of business of the purchaser or collector of, or
47
dealer in, junk, scrap metal, or any secondhand property.
48
No detached catalytic converter shall be altered, modified ,
49
disassembled, or destroyed until it has been in the

SCS HB 2383 27
50
purchaser's, collector's, or dealer's possession for five
51
business days.
52
5. Anyone licensed under section 301.218 who knowingly
53
purchas e s a stolen regulated metal [detached catalytic
54
converter] shall be subject to the following penalties:
55
(1) For a first violation, a fine in the amount of
56
five tho u sand dollars;
57
(2) For a second violation, a fine in the amount of
58
ten thou s and dollars; and
59
(3) For a third violation, revocation of the license
60
for a bu s iness described under section 301.218.
61
6. This section shall not apply to either of the
62
followi n g transactions:
63
(1) Any transaction for which the seller has an
64
existing business relationship with the scrap metal dealer
65
and is known to the scrap metal dealer making the purchase
66
to be an established business or political subdivision that
67
operates a business with a fixed location that can be
68
reasonably expected to generate regulated scrap metal and
69
can be reasonably identified as such a business, and for
70
which the seller is paid by check or by electronic funds
71
transfer, or the seller produces an acceptable
72
identification, which shall be a copy of the driver's
73
license or photo identification issued by the state or by
74
the United States government or agency thereof, and a copy
75
is retained by the purchaser; or
76
(2) Any transaction for which the type of metal
77
subject t o subsection 1 of this section is a minor part of a
78
larger item, except for heating and cooling equipment or
79
equipment used in the generation and transmission of
80
electrical power or telecommunications.

SCS HB 2383 28
81
7. No metal recycling entity or scrap metal yard shall
82
purchas e any regulated metal from a seller who, at the time
83
of the sale:
84
(1) Uses a name other than such seller's legal name or
85
the regi s tered name of the seller's business;
86
(2) Is less than eighteen years of age; or
87
(3) Is reasonably perceived to be under the influence
88
of alcoh o l, a controlled substance, or drug, or any
89
combination thereof.
90
8. (1) A metal recycling entity or scrap metal yard
91
shall a t all times maintain in a prominent place in the
92
entity or yard's place of business, in open view to the
93
seller of a regulated metal, a notice in bold 144-point font
94
that:
95
(a) Includes the following disclosures:
96
"ANY PERSON ATTEMPTING TO SELL ANY REGULATED
97
METAL MUST PRESENT SUFFICIENT IDENTIFICATION
98
AND WRITTEN PROOF OF OWNERSHIP REQUIRED BY
99
STATE LAW.
100
WARNING: STATE LAW PROVIDES A CRIMINAL
101
PENALTY FOR A PERSON WHO INTENTIONALLY
102
PROVIDES A FALSE DOCUMENT OF IDENTIFICATION OR
103
OTHER FALSE INFORMATION TO A METAL RECYCLING
104
ENTITY WHILE ATTEMPTING TO SELL ANY REGULATED
105
METAL."; and
106
(b) States the metal recycling entity or scrap metal
107
yard's r e gular business hours.
108
(2) Disclosures required by this subsection may be
109
included on a sign that contains another notice if the metal
110
recycling entity or scrap metal yard is required to display
111
another notice under another provision of law.

SCS HB 2383 29
1
407.303. 1. Any scrap metal dealer, metal recycling
2
entity, or sc r ap m etal yard paying out [an] any amount [that
3
is five hundred dollars or more] shall make such payment by
4
issuing a prenumbered check drawn on a regular bank account
5
in the name of the licensed scrap metal dealer and with such
6
check made payable to the person documented as the seller in
7
accordance with this section, or by using a system for
8
automated cash or electronic payment distribution which
9
photographs or videotapes the payment recipient and
10
identifies the payment with a distinct transaction in the
11
register maintained in accordance with this chapter.
12
2. [Any] No scrap metal dealer, metal recycling
13
entity, or scrap metal yard that purchases scrap metal from
14
a seller [and pays] shall pay in the form of cash [is
15
required to obtain a copy of the seller's driver's license
16
or nondriver's license if the metal is copper or a catalytic
17
converter]. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1
18
of this sect ion to the contrary, this section shall not
19
apply to any transaction for which the seller has an
20
existing business relationship with the scrap metal dealer,
21
metal recycling entity, or scrap metal yard and is known to
22
the scrap metal dealer, metal recycling entity, or scrap
23
metal yard making the purchase to be an established business
24
or political subdivision that operates a business with a
25
fixed location that can be reasonably expected to generate
26
regulated scrap metal and can be reasonably identified as
27
such a business.
28
3. Any person who knowingly and willfully violates the
29
provisi o ns of sections 407.300 to 407.303 shall be guilty of
30
a class B misdemeanor and a fine of up to five hundred
31
dollars for the first offense, a class A misdemeanor and a
32
fine of up to one thousand dollars for the second offense,

SCS HB 2383 30
33
and the revocation of any and all business licenses that are
34
held with the state for the third offense.
35
4. Any person in violation of sections 407.300 to
36
407.303 by selling stolen scrap metal shall be responsible
37
for consequential damages related to obtaining the scrap
38
metal.
1
407.304. The department shall provide to every scrap
2
metal dealer, metal recycling entity, or scrap metal yard a
3
searchable, electronic list prepared in accordance with the
4
rules adopted by the department, pursuant to section
5
407.299, with the names and descriptions of persons known to
6
be receivers of stolen property. No scrap metal dealer,
7
metal recycling entity, or scrap metal yard shall purchase
8
or receive regulated metals from any person identified on
9
the list.
1
569.086. 1. As used in this section, "critical
2
infrastructur e fa c ility" means any of the following
3
facilities that are under construction or operational: a
4
petroleum or alumina refinery; critical electric
5
infrastructure, as defined in 18 CFR [Section 118.113(c)(3)]
6
Section 388.113(c)(3) including, but not limited to, an
7
electrical power generating facility, substation, switching
8
station, electrical control center, or electric power lines
9
and associated equipment infrastructure; a chemical,
10
polymer, or rubber manufacturing facility; a water intake
11
structure, water storage facility, water treatment facility,
12
wastewater treatment plant, wastewater pumping facility, or
13
pump station; a natural gas compressor station; a liquid
14
natural gas terminal or storage facility; a
15
telecommunications central switching office; wireline or
16
wireless telecommunications networks, infrastructure, or
17
facilities, including cell towers, telephone poles and

SCS HB 2383 31
18
lines, including fiber optic lines; a port, railroad
19
switching yard, railroad tracks, trucking terminal, or other
20
freight transportation facility; a gas processing plant,
21
including a plant used in the processing, treatment, or
22
fractionation of natural gas or natural gas liquids; a
23
transmission facility used by a federally licensed radio or
24
television station; a steelmaking facility that uses an
25
electric arc furnace to make steel; a facility identified
26
and regulated by the United States Department of Homeland
27
Security Chemical Facility Anti-Terrorism Standards (CFATS)
28
program; a dam that is regulated by the state or federal
29
government; a natural gas distribution utility facility
30
including, but not limited to, natural gas distribution and
31
transmission mains and services, pipeline interconnections,
32
a city gate or town border station, metering station,
33
aboveground piping, a regulator station, and a natural gas
34
storage facility; a crude oil or refined products storage
35
and distribution facility including, but not limited to,
36
valve sites, pipeline interconnection, pump station,
37
metering station, below or aboveground pipeline or piping
38
and truck loading or offloading facility, a grain mill or
39
processing facility; [a] networks and facilities used in the
40
generation, transmission, or distribution [system] of
41
broadband internet access; or any aboveground portion of an
42
oil, gas, hazardous liquid or chemical pipeline, tank,
43
railroad facility, or other storage facility that is
44
enclosed by a fence, other physical barrier, or is clearly
45
marked with signs prohibiting trespassing, that are
46
obviously designed to exclude intruders.
47
2. A person commits the offense of trespass on a
48
critica l infrastructure facility if he or she purposely
49
trespasses or enters property containing a critical

SCS HB 2383 32
50
infrastructure facility without the permission of the owner
51
of the property or lawful occupant thereof. The offense of
52
trespass on a critical infrastructure facil i ty is a class B
53
misdemeanor. [If it is determined that the intent of the
54
trespasser i s to damage, destroy, or tamper with equipment,
55
or impede or inhibit operations of the facility, the person
56
shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
57
3. A person commits the offense of damage of a
58
critica l infrastructure if he or she purposely damages,
59
destroys, or tampers with equipment in a critical
60
infrastructure facility. The offense of damage of a
61
critical infrastructure f acility is a class D felony.
62
4.] 3. This section shall not apply to conduct
63
protecte d u n der the Constitution of the United States, the
64
Constitution of [the state of] Missouri, or a state or
65
federal law or rule.
1
569.117. 1. A person commits the offense of damage of
2
a critical in f ras t ructure facility, as defined in section
3
569.086, if he or she:
4
(1) Purposely damages, destroys, or tampers with
5
equipmen t in a critical infrastructure facility; or
6
(2) Recklessly damages, destroys, or tampers with a
7
critical infrastructure facility, or removes any component
8
of the critical infrastructure facility, excluding equipment.
9
2. Except as provided under subsection 3 of this
10
section , the offense of damage of a critical infrastructure
11
facility under:
12
(1) Subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section is
13
a class D felony; or
14
(2) Subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section is
15
a:

SCS HB 2383 33
16
(a) Class A misdemeanor if the damage is under seven
17
hundred f ifty dollars;
18
(b) Class E felony if the damage is seven hundred
19
fifty do l lars or more but less than twenty-five thousand
20
dollars; or
21
(c) Class D felony if the damage is twenty-five
22
thousand dollars or more.
23
3. If the damage to a critical infrastructure facility
24
causes i nterruption, impairment, or degradation of service,
25
the offense of damage of a critical infrastructure facility
26
shall be a class C felony regardless of value.
27
4. The value of damages under this section shall be
28
determi n ed under the provisions of section 570.020.
29
5. (1) Any person who commits a violation under this
30
section shal l be required to make restitution and perform
31
community service as provided in this subsection.
32
(2) Restitution shall be made under the provisions of
33
section 5 59.105.
34
(3) Community service shall be imposed as follows:
35
(a) One hundred hours for the first offense;
36
(b) Two hundred hours for the second offense; or
37
(c) Up to three hundred hours for the third or any
38
subseque n t offense.
1
569.119. 1. As used in this section, the following
2
terms mean:
3
(1) "Copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or
4
telecomm u nications material", any insulated or noninsulated
5
copper, brass, aluminum, fiber-optic, or telecommunications
6
wire, cable, pipe, tubing, power inverter, bus bar,
7
broadband cable, fiber-optic line, or any material
8
containing copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, glass, or metal
9
components that is commonly used in construction, electrical

SCS HB 2383 34
10
systems, telecommunications networks, broadband
11
infrastructure, utilities, or related commercial or
12
industrial applications;
13
(2) "Critical infrastructure facility", the same
14
meaning a s defined under section 569.086.
15
2. A person commits the offense of unauthorized
16
possess i on of certain copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or
17
telecommunications material if the person:
18
(1) Knowingly possesses copper, brass, aluminum,
19
fiber, o r telecommunications material; and
20
(2) Is not a person authorized to possess such
21
material as provided under subsection 3 of this section.
22
3. Subject to subsection 4 of this section, the
23
followi n g persons are authorized to possess copper, brass,
24
aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications material:
25
(1) The owner of the material;
26
(2) A public utility, rural electric cooperative,
27
municipa l utility, or common carrier;
28
(3) A telecommunications provider, internet service
29
provider , cable service provider, or video service provider;
30
(4) A manufacturing, industrial, commercial, retail,
31
or simil a r business that sells or uses such material in the
32
ordinary course of business;
33
(5) A carrier-for-hire acting in the course and scope
34
of the c a rrier's business and possessing appropriate
35
documentation, including a bill of lading or contract
36
verifying transport information;
37
(6) A scrap metal or metal recycling dealer under
38
chapter 4 07 and acting within the ordinary course of
39
business;

SCS HB 2383 35
40
(7) A person acting in the ordinary course of lawful
41
construc t ion, remodeling, demolition, or salvage work who
42
lawfully acquires the material through such activities; or
43
(8) Any agent, employee, subcontractor, or
44
represen t ative of a person described in subdivisions (1) to
45
(7) of this subsection who is acting within the course and
46
scope of such authority.
47
4. The authorization provided under subsection 3 of
48
this se c tion does not apply to a person who knows that the
49
copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications
50
material was unlawfully obtained.
51
5. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
52
subsect i on, t he offense of unauthorized possession of
53
certain copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or
54
telecommunications material is a class E felony.
55
(2) The offense of unauthorized possession of certain
56
copper, b rass, aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications
57
material is a class D felony if it is shown at trial that:
58
(a) The material was unlawfully obtained from a
59
critical infrastructure facility;
60
(b) The person has a prior conviction for any offense
61
involvin g theft, property damage, tampering, receiving
62
stolen property, or unauthorized possession of copper,
63
brass, aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications material; or
64
(c) The person conspired with or acted in concert with
65
another t o commit theft, property damage, tampering, or
66
receiving stolen property involving such material.
67
6. If conduct constituting an offense under this
68
section also constitutes an offense under any other
69
provision of law, the person may be prosecuted under either

SCS HB 2383 36
70
or both provisions subject to the provisions of section
71
556.041.
